District of Columbia statutes.
2-140

Notice of attempted residential service.

(a)

Within 90 days after April 11, 1986, the Mayor shall issue rules establishing a system under which agencies of the District of Columbia government which provide the services enumerated in this section to residents of the District of Columbia upon request shall notify the requestor that a service cannot be provided. The rules shall provide for notice pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and for notice to be left, if possible, (1) by being pushed under the internal door on the premises of the requestor, (2) by being pushed through a mail slot in the internal door on the premises of the requestor, or (3) as a last resort, in any manner on the premises of the requestor that offers a reasonable assurance that it will remain there until retrieved by the resident.

(b)

The rules shall provide a system under which the following information shall be made available to the residents: The name of the agency, the name of the individual attempting to provide the service, the date and time of the attempt to complete the requested service, the reason the service could not be delivered, and a telephone number that the resident can call to reschedule service.

(c)

The services covered by this section shall include bulk trash collection, tree trimming, alley cleaning, leaf collection, inspections for alleged housing code violations, and any other service included in the rules issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

(d)

All rules issued pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the Council for a 45-day review period.

(e)

The Council may, by resolution, approve or disapprove the rules, in whole or in part, within the 45-day review period. If the Council, by resolution, does not approve or disapprove the regulations before the expiration of the 45-day review period, the regulations shall become effective at the expiration of the 45-day review period.

Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-103, § 2, 33 DCR 1157
Business improvement districts, collection and disbursement of taxes, see § 2-1215.15.
Washington Convention Center Authority, limitations on authority’s powers, see § 10-1202.04.
1981 Ed., § 1-1028.